Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,111
Violation; general penalty provisions.

Whoever violates any provision of the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act for which no specific penalty is provided shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 27, p. 522;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 7, p. 475;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-432;

R.S.1943, § 60-430;

Laws 1959, c. 293, § 2, p. 1098;

Laws 1971, LB 20, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 80;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-430;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 61.

Conviction and sentence of unlicensed driver affirmed. State v. Meints, 223 Neb. 199, 388 N.W.2d 813 (1986).

This section sets forth the general penalty for violation of the operator's license act. State v. Ruggiere, 180 Neb. 869, 146 N.W.2d 373 (1966).

Conviction for second offense committed after amendment of this section was proper even though first offense was committed prior to amendment. State v. Steemer, 175 Neb. 342, 121 N.W.2d 813 (1963).